Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Care, Maintenance and Protection of Irrigation Works

§ 41-5-101.
Ditches; generally.

The owner or owners of any ditch for irrigation, or other purposes, shall carefully maintain the embankments thereof so that the water of such ditch may not flood or damage the premises of others.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 65, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1323; R.S. 1899, § 901; C.S. 1910, § 813; C.S. 1920, § 934; R.S. 1931, § 122-1201; C.S. 1945, § 71-2501; W.S. 1957, § 41-217.

History of section. —

Chapter 65, C.L. 1876, has largely been repealed; the only other remaining sections appear herein as §§

41-5-104

and

41-5-109

. As to protection of vested rights, see §

41-5-109

.

The owner of an irrigating ditch is bound to exercise reasonable care and skill

to prevent injury to other persons from such ditch, and he will be liable for all damages occurring to others as a result of his negligence or unskillfulness in constructing, maintaining, or operating the ditch. Taylor Ditch Co. v. Carey, 520 P.2d 218,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1974).

A ditch company, with right to maintain its ditch over lands of another, is liable to landowner for injury to stock which fall into dangerous washout, because of the company's failure to guard it, though the right to maintain the ditches over the land was obtained while it was public land. Big Goose & Beaver Ditch Co. v. Morrow, 8 Wyo. 537, 59 P. 159,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1899).

Though statutes did not specifically require exercise of care in construction and guarding of bottom of an irrigation canal, they did not exempt owner from liability for injuries cause by negligence in that behalf. Howell v. Big Horn Basin Colonization Co., 14 Wyo. 14, 81 P. 785,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1905).

The duty to maintain an irrigation ditch is a continuing one.

Taylor Ditch Co. v. Carey, 520 P.2d 218,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1974).

Negligence determines liability of owners of failed canal headgate. —

Negligence, not strict liability, was the standard to be applied in determining the liability of the owners of a canal headgate which failed and allowed a ranch to be flooded. Tillery v. West Side Canal, 719 P.2d 1384,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1986).

Burden of proof. —

Even though the trial court's finding that water seeped from the ditch through negligence is supported by substantial evidence, the burden still remains with the plaintiffs to establish that the seepage resulted in injury to the plaintiffs and the amount of damages resulting therefrom. Taylor Ditch Co. v. Carey, 520 P.2d 218,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1974).

Expert testimony not needed to determine whether standard of care breached. —

In a negligence action filed by a landowner to recover damages which resulted from the failure of an irrigation canal, the court did not need any expert testimony to determine whether the standard of care for a ditch or canal owner — that of a reasonable, prudent ditch owner — had been breached. Pine Creek Canal No. 1 v. Stadler, 685 P.2d 13,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1984).

Proximate cause. —

Where a landowner's stock, caused by a snowstorm to travel towards an unguarded washout in a ditch, which is maintained over the land by ditch company, falls into same, failure of the company to guard such washout was natural and proximate cause of the injury, and not the storm. Big Goose & Beaver Ditch Co. v. Morrow, 8 Wyo. 537, 59 P. 159,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1899).

Limitations of actions. —

In landowners' action for damage to their property occurring as the result of long-continued seepage from an irrigation ditch, court's refusal to assume that entire reduction in value of landowners' property due to seepage occurred when seepage began, which date was beyond the statute of limitations, was not erroneous. Taylor Ditch Co. v. Carey, 520 P.2d 218,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty of mutual association, nonprofit organization, or cooperative to distribute irrigation waters, 56 ALR2d 413.

Rights, as between private parties, as to relocation of irrigation ditch easement not originally arising by necessity, 80 ALR2d 743.

§ 41-5-102.
Ditches; jointly owned; action to recover proportionate share of work.

In all cases where irrigating ditches are owned by two (2) or more persons and one (1) or more of such persons shall fail or neglect to do his, her or their proportionate share of the work necessary for the proper maintenance and operation of such ditch or ditches or to construct suitable head gates or measuring devices at the points where water is diverted from the main ditch, such owner or owners desiring the performance of such work as is reasonably necessary to maintain the ditch, may, after having given ten (10) days written notice to such owner or owners who have failed to perform his, her or their proportionate share of such work, necessary for the operation and maintenance of said ditch or ditches, perform his, her or their share of such work, and recover therefor from such person or persons so failing to perform his, her or their share of such work in any competent court having jurisdiction of the matter, the expense or value of such work or labor so performed.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 72, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 915; Laws 1903, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 822; C.S. 1920, § 944; R.S. 1931, § 122-1301; C.S. 1945, § 71-2503; W.S. 1957, § 41-218.

Equitable apportionment of costs. —

Where plaintiff landowners had appropriation rights in a canal, the establishment of a reasonable annual water delivery fee by defendant irrigation district for maintenance and operation of the canal had to be based on an equitable apportionment under this section determined after a consideration of various factors.
Rageth v. Sidon Irrigation Dist., 2011 WY 121, 258 P.3d 712,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2011).

Shutting off water. —

Where contract between plaintiff and S. authorized latter to use plaintiff's irrigation ditch on condition that he enlarge it, and also conferred on him in that event right to clean out and repair the ditch whenever it became necessary, plaintiff having failed to prove that S. did not enlarge the ditch as agreed, it would be presumed that his act in shutting off the water in order to clean out the ditch was necessary and reasonable and not tortious. Mau v. Stoner, 15 Wyo. 109, 87 P. 434,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1906), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 109, 87 P. 434,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1907).

§ 41-5-103.
Ditches; jointly owned; lien for work.

Upon the failure of any co-owner to pay his proportionate share of such expense as mentioned in W.S.

41-5-102

, within thirty (30) days after receiving a statement of the same as performed by his co-owner or owners, such person or persons so performing such labor may secure payment of said claim by filing an itemized and sworn statement thereof, setting forth the date of the performance and the nature of the labor so performed, with the county clerk of the county wherein said ditch is situated, and when so filed it shall constitute a valid lien against the interest of such person or persons who shall fail to perform their proportionate share of the work requisite to the proper maintenance of said ditch, which said lien when so taken may be enforced in the same manner as provided by law for the enforcement of construction liens.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 72, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 916; C.S. 1910, § 823; C.S. 1920, § 945; R.S. 1931, § 122-1302; C.S. 1945, § 71-2504; W.S. 1957, § 41-219; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Irrigation district must maintain records of expenses. —

Where plaintiff landowners had appropriation rights in a canal, the establishment of a reasonable annual water delivery fee by defendant irrigation district for maintenance and operation of the canal had to be based on an equitable apportionment determined after a consideration of various factors. The landowner's claim that the irrigation district was required to maintain separate records of the actual expenses requisite to the proper maintenance of the creek diversion and the canal was supported by this section.
Rageth v. Sidon Irrigation Dist., 2011 WY 121, 258 P.3d 712,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 41-5-104.
Ditches; bridge to be built when ditch crosses public roads; costs of construction; failure to comply.

When any such ditch or watercourse shall be constructed across any public traveled road, and not bridged within three (3) days thereafter, it shall be the duty of the county commissioners of the county in which said ditch and road are located, to put a bridge over said ditch or watercourse, and call upon the owner or owners of said ditch or watercourse to pay the expenses of constructing said bridge, and if payment thereof be refused, a civil action may be maintained for the recovery of the same, together with all accruing costs.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 65, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1326; R.S. 1899, § 903; C.S. 1910, § 815; C.S. 1920, § 936; R.S. 1931, § 122-1203; C.S. 1945, § 71-2505; W.S. 1957, § 41-220.

§ 41-5-105.
When capital stock of irrigation companies assessable for maintenance.

Any ditch or irrigation company or association, all the property or capital stock of which is owned by farmers or others, owning lands under the line of such company’s or association’s ditch, and receiving water therefrom, by reason of their being owners or stockholders in said company or association, shall have the right to levy and collect such annual assessments on the capital stock of said company, or members or owners of such association, whether said capital stock be fully paid up or otherwise, as may be deemed necessary by the trustees of said company, or a majority of the stock of such association, for the purpose of maintaining its ditches, flumes, tunnels, and the payment of all necessary expenses of such company; provided, that this section shall only apply to such water companies or associations whose capital stock or ditch property is wholly owned by persons or corporations owning land under the line of their ditches, and using water therefrom by reason of being such stockholders in said companies; and provided further, that said company or association shall have the right to close the headgate and refuse water to all such stockholders, owners or members who fail or refuse to pay said assessments after ten (10) days notice thereof, in writing, made by the president, agent or attorney of said company or association.

History.

Laws 1893, ch. 23, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 976; C.S. 1910, § 820; C.S. 1920, § 941; R.S. 1931, § 122-1208; C.S. 1945, § 71-2509; W.S. 1957, § 41-221.

Maintenance charges. —

Ditch company could not recover for maintenance charges for years during which it furnished no water for irrigation because it was unable to do so, notwithstanding absence of demand for delivery of water. McHale v. Goshen Ditch Co., 49 Wyo. 100, 52 P.2d 678,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 41-5-106.
Keeping fish out of irrigation systems.

The game and fish department of the state of Wyoming may construct and maintain, at or near the point of diversion where the water of any stream or reservoir is diverted by any means of conveyance from its natural channel, some fit and proper device whereby all fish will be prevented from entering said means of conveyance; provided, such device does not obstruct or diminish the flow of water through said means of conveyance; and provided further that the determination as to obstruction shall be within the discretion of the water commissioner of the district within which such structure is placed subject to appeal to the division superintendent, and from the decision of the division superintendent to the state engineer.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 61, § 30; R.S. 1887, § 1360; R.S. 1899, § 970; C.S. 1910, § 816; C.S. 1920, § 937; R.S. 1931, § 122-1204; Laws 1941, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-2506; W.S. 1957, § 41-222.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting obstruction across stream or lake without consent of fish warden, and as to erection of fishways, see §

23-3-203

.

Validity of act. —

“An act providing for the supervision and use of waters of the state” is not invalid. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

§ 41-5-107.
Removal or destruction of bridges or flumes.

Whenever any person, persons or corporation shall remove or destroy any bridge or flume which crosses any ditch, canal or other irrigation works, when said flume or bridge is in good condition a legal right for such crossing having been acquired, said person, persons or corporations must replace said bridge or flume, in as good condition as before removal. If said bridge or flume is removed by the owner or owners of the said ditch, canal or irrigation works; it shall be the duty of the water commissioner to keep the controlling works of the said ditch, canal or irrigation works closed until the said bridge or flume is properly replaced. It shall be unlawful for any other person to remove or destroy any such bridge or flumes. Any violation of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 47, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 943; R.S. 1931, § 122-1210; C.S. 1945, § 71-2510; W.S. 1957, § 41-223; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the former last sentence, which provided that removal or destruction of flumes was a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of up to $100 and/or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not exceeding 90 days, and added the present last sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Measure and elements of damages for injury to bridge, 31 ALR5th 171.

§ 41-5-108.
Driving or floating logs, timber or lumber on streams.

Any person, association or corporation desiring or intending to drive or float logs, timber or lumber down or upon any stream in this state shall, before commencing operations apply to the state engineer for a permit to drive or float the same. Such application shall be in writing and shall state that the driving of such logs, timber or lumber will be conducted with all possible expedition and in such manner as not to interfere with, or injure any irrigating ditch or other property along the stream on which said drive is to take place, and the applicant shall be required by the state engineer to give bond to the state of Wyoming in such sum as the state engineer may deem sufficient, conditioned for the conducting of said drive without delay and for the protection of the owners of irrigating ditches and property along the stream whereon said drive is to be made. When said permit is issued the said applicant may proceed to conduct said drive upon the stream or streams therein mentioned. Provided, however, that no permit shall be granted allowing any logs, timber or lumber to be left in or upon any stream so as to be frozen in during winter, and it shall be the duty of the state engineer to issue to all applicants a license to float timber or lumber on all streams of sufficient capacity, upon compliance with the provisions aforesaid.

Anyone violating any of the provisions of this section, shall be subject to penalty pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 89, § 1; 1903, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, § 838; C.S. 1920, § 950; R.S. 1931, § 122-1701; C.S. 1945, § 71-2511; W.S. 1957, § 41-224; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (b), which formerly provided that violation of the section was punishable by a fine of up to $100 and/or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not exceeding three months.

Subject to certain limitations, the actual usability of the waters is alone the limit of the public's right to so employ them. —

This section indicates the legislature was aware that, without regard to their being navigable or nonnavigable in the federal sense or any other concept of navigability, it waters were usable for purposes other than irrigation, consumption, power or mining, and the waters might be used for transportation by flotation. So it would seem that subject to whatever statutory limitations may be imposed by the state on such use or by the federal government when interstate or international rights are involved, the actual usability of the waters is alone the limit of the public's right to so employ them. Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 41-5-109.
Construction of acts.

Nothing in this chapter contained, shall be so construed as to impair the prior vested rights of any mill or ditch owner, or other person, to the use of any such watercourse.

This chapter shall in no wise be construed as impairing or abridging any rights already vested in any person or persons, company or corporation by virtue of the law heretofore in force.

History.

A) C.L. 1876, ch. 65, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1324; R.S. 1899, § 902; C.S. 1910, § 814, C.S. 1920, § 935; R.S. 1931, § 122-1202; C.S. 1945, § 71-2502; W.S. 1957, § 41-225. (b) Laws 1886, ch. 61, § 31; R.S. 1887, § 1361; R.S. 1899, § 977; C.S. 1910, § 821; C.S. 1920, § 942; R.S. 1931, § 122-1209; C.S. 1945, § 71-2507; W.S. 1957, § 41-225.

History of section. —

Because of the similarity in the provisions of §§ 71-2502 and 71-2507, W.C.S. 1945, they have been combined to form a single section consisting of two paragraphs, each carrying its own historical citation.

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900).

§ 41-5-110.
Prohibited acts; penalty for violation.

It shall be unlawful for any person without authority, to willfully interfere with or damage any dam, diversion structure or means of conveyance whether jointly owned by the person, on the property or in the lawful possession of another, with intent to injure any person, or for his own gain, to the injury of any other person lawfully entitled to the use of such water, diversion structure or means of conveyance. Any violation of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 61, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 1347; R.S. 1899, § 973; C.S. 1910, § 819; C.S. 1920, § 940; R.S. 1931, § 122-1207; C.S. 1945, § 71-2508; W.S. 1957, § 41-226; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section in accordance with the enactment of §

41-3-616

.

§ 41-5-111.
Irrigation facility modification and maintenance.

Any person who, acting directly or indirectly through an agent or representative, in trespass or in other violation of the rights of a user, wrongfully modifies an existing irrigation ditch or other irrigation facility in any manner that diminishes the capacity or adversely affects the utility of the ditch or irrigation facility is liable to the users for all restoration costs. If restoration is not feasible and the effort or cost of maintaining the modified ditch or facility is increased, then the person is thereafter liable to the users for the amount of increased maintenance that results from the modifications.

For cases in which restoration is feasible, any adversely affected user may serve a written demand for restoration. If restoration is not feasible and requires increased maintenance, efforts or costs, any adversely affected user may serve a written demand for immediate and continued maintenance. A copy of this section shall be annexed to the written demand. The demand shall be delivered to the actor in person, or if the actor cannot be found then the demand shall be delivered conspicuously to the actor’s usual place of business or residence. If the actor fails to accomplish complete restoration or all the currently necessary maintenance within forty-eight (48) hours after the written demand is delivered in accordance with this subsection, the user may perform the restoration and may do the maintenance that is then necessary, as well as that which becomes necessary thereafter, and may recover the reasonable costs thereof from the actor. If the modification is so gross that restoration cannot reasonably be completed within the forty-eight (48) hour period, then the duty to restore is satisfied when:

Within twenty-four (24) hours after delivery of the demand, the actor undertakes a good faith effort to mitigate harm to other users and to restore the facility and the effort is:

Commensurate with the magnitude of harm or potential harm to the users; and

Continuously and diligently pursued to completion in a timely manner.

Every user who provides the restoration or maintenance shall have a lien on the actor’s interest or property that is involved in the modification. If the property involved is land, the lien extends to one (1) acre, unless the modification extends or covers more than one (1) acre, in which case the lien shall extend to all the additional land covered by the modification. If the land subject to the modification is located in any city, town or subdivision, the lien shall extend to each entire lot upon which the modification is located. If the actor’s interest or property is only a ditch right or reservoir right, or such, then the one (1) acre shall be at the site where the water under the actor’s ditch or reservoir right, or other interest is first applied to beneficial use.

In order to have a perfected lien, a lien claimant shall file with the county clerk a lien statement that conforms to the requirements of W.S.

29-1-312

, and shall notify the last known record owner as provided in W.S.

29-1-312

. The county clerk shall record and index the statement as provided in W.S. 29-1-312. When so perfected, the lien may be enforced in the same manner as provided in W.S.

29-4-101

and

29-4-102

and is subject to the limitation in W.S.

29-2-109

.

If litigation is necessary to enforce the lien, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of litigation, to be fixed and awarded by the court, unless the court finds that the nonprevailing party had reasonable grounds to expect to prevail.

The remedies provided by this section are not exclusive but are supplemental to other remedies in law or equity. This section does not in any way alter or affect law regarding water rights, covenants, easements or other servitudes, or other rights.

As used in this section:

“Actor” means a person who wrongfully modifies an existing irrigation ditch or other irrigation facility as specified in subsection (a) of this section;

“User” means an individual, ditch company whether organized or unorganized, irrigation district, or other person or entity lawfully permitted to use water under an adjudicated or other valid water right who uses a ditch or facility for conveyance of direct flow, or waste water, or storage of water in the beneficial use of water under the water right.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 192, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), substituted “W.S.

29-1-312

” for “W.S.

29-1-301

” throughout, inserted “record” in the first sentence, and substituted “record and index” for “file and index” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.